California statutes. Public Contract Code
A job order contractor or subcontractor that knowingly violates the provisions involving employment of apprentices shall forfeit as a civil penalty an amount not exceeding one hundred dollars ($100) for each full calendar day of noncompliance. The amount of this penalty shall be based on consideration of whether the violation was a good faith mistake due to inadvertence. A contractor or subcontractor that knowingly commits a second or subsequent violation of the provisions involving employment of apprentices within a three-year period where the noncompliance results in apprenticeship training not being provided as required, shall forfeit as a civil penalty a sum of not more than three hundred dollars ($300) for each full calendar day of noncompliance and shall not be awarded any further job orders under the job order contract
 and shall be precluded for a period of one year from bidding on any future job order contracts.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 296, Sec. 1.   (AB 618)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 20665.33.)
-------------------------------------------

20665.31.

In order to prevent fraud, waste, and abuse, a community college district adopting job order contracting shall do all of the following:

(a) Prepare for each individual job order developed under a job order contract an independent community college district estimate. The estimate will be prepared prior to the receipt of the contractor’s offer to perform work and will be compared to the contractor’s proposed price to determine the reasonableness of that price before issuance of any job order. The basis for any adjustments to the community college district estimate is to be documented. If the contractor’s proposal for a given job order is found to be unreasonable, not cost effective, or undesirable, the community college district is under no obligation to issue the
 job order to the job order contractor, and may instead utilize any other available procurement procedures.

(b) The community college district shall not issue a job order until the job order has been reviewed and approved by the appropriate level of management.

(c) Once a job order has been issued, all documents pertaining to preparation and approval of the job order, including the independent community college district estimate, shall be available for public review.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 296, Sec. 1.   (AB 618)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 20665.33.)
-------------------------------------------

20665.32.

A community college district that adopts the job order contracting process shall also adopt a payment resolution process which may include, but not be limited to, the convening of a payment resolution committee.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 296, Sec. 1.   (AB 618)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 20665.33.)
-------------------------------------------

20665.33.

This article shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2027, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 303, Sec. 2.   (AB 846)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.   Note: Termination date applies to Article 41.5, commencing with Section 20665.20.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 42. Public Entities—Public Work and Public Purchases [20670. - 20676.]

20670.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by public entities as provided for in Division 5 (commencing with Section 4000) of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 256, Sec. 85.)
-------------------------------------------

20671.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “Public leaseback” means any lease by a public entity, as lessee, of buildings, structures, or other facilities which are permanently attached to land, where the lease is between the public entity and a public leaseback corporation, as lessor, and the lease is executed before the buildings, structures, or facilities have been built.

(b) “Public entity” means any city, charter city, city and county, county, district, public corporation, or political subdivision of the state.

(c) “Public leaseback corporation” means any corporation or nonprofit corporation organized or controlled by a public entity which constructs or arranges for the construction of buildings, structures, or other facilities which are permanently attached to land for public leaseback.

(d) “Public projects” means the construction of buildings, structures, or other facilities which are permanently attached to land.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 256, Sec. 85.)
-------------------------------------------

20672.

Any public project by a public leaseback corporation in excess of three thousand dollars ($3,000) shall be constructed under contract awarded to the lowest responsible bidder, and such contract shall require the payment of prevailing wages as determined by the public leaseback corporation in the manner and form provided in Article 2 (commencing with Section 1770) of Chapter 1 of Part 7 of Division 2 of the Labor Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 256, Sec. 85.)
-------------------------------------------

20673.

For the purpose of securing bids, the public leaseback corporation shall give notice of the time and place for opening bids to prospective bidders by publication once a week for two consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation printed and published in the jurisdiction in which the land is located, or if located in more than one jurisdiction, in such a newspaper in a jurisdiction in which a major portion of the project is to be done. If there is no such newspaper, then publication shall be in a newspaper of general circulation circulating in the jurisdiction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 256, Sec. 85.)
-------------------------------------------

20674.

All bids for construction work shall be presented under sealed cover and shall be accompanied by one of the following forms of bidder’s security:

(a) Cash.

(b) A cashier’s check made payable to the public entity.

(c) A certified check made payable to the public entity.

(d) A bidder’s bond executed by an admitted surety insurer, made payable to the public entity.

Any bid may be withdrawn at any time prior to the time fixed in the public notice for the opening of bids by written request for the withdrawal of the bid filed with the public leaseback corporation. The request shall be executed by the bidder or the bidder’s duly authorized representative. The withdrawal of a bid does not prejudice the right of the bidder to submit a new bid. Whether or not bids are opened exactly at the time fixed in the public notice for opening bids, a bid shall not be received after that time.

Upon an award to the lowest bidder, the security of an unsuccessful bidder shall be returned in a reasonable period of time, but in no event shall that security be held by the public entity beyond 60 days from the time the award is made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 808, Sec. 43.)
-------------------------------------------

20675.

If the public leaseback corporation deems the acceptance of the lowest responsible bid is not in the best interests of the public entity the public leaseback corporation may reject all bids and advertise for other bids in the manner required by this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 256, Sec. 85.)
-------------------------------------------

20676.

A contractor or a mining operator shall not sell any sand, gravel, or other minerals, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 10295.5, to a local agency, unless the operation is not subject to the Surface Mining and Reclamation Act of 1975 (Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 2710) of Division 2 of the Public Resources Code), or unless the contractor or mining operator certifies, under penalty of perjury, that the minerals are from a mining operation identified in the list published pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 2717 of the Public Resources Code.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 869, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 43. Community Services Districts [20680. - 20683.]

20680.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by community services districts as provided for in the Community Services District Law pursuant to Division 3 (commencing with Section 61000) of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 256, Sec. 86.)
-------------------------------------------

20682.

(a) A district may purchase materials and supplies for the construction or completion of any building, structure, or improvements in the open market when the cost does not exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000).

(b) Contracts for materials and supplies for the construction or completion of any building, structure, or improvement, when the cost exceeds twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000), shall be contracted for and let to the lowest responsible bidder after notice. If two or more bids are the same and the lowest, the district board may accept the one it chooses.

(c) The district shall publish a notice inviting bids for any contract for which competitive bidding is required at least one time in a newspaper of general circulation in the district at least one week before the time specified for receiving bids. The notice inviting bids shall set a date for opening the bids and distinctly state the materials and supplies to be purchased.

(d) If the general manager recommends and the board of directors determines that the publication of advertisements of the notice in trade journals and papers in lieu of publication pursuant to subdivision (c) will increase the number of business enterprises receiving that notice, the board of directors may by resolution declare that those notices shall be published in trade journals and papers at least 10 days prior to the time specified for receiving bids.

(e) At its discretion, the board of directors may reject any bids presented and readvertise.

(f) In the case of an emergency, the board of directors may act pursuant to Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 22050).

(g) As an alternate to the procedures required by this section, a district may rely on the Uniform Public Construction Cost Accounting Act, Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 22000) of Part 3 of Division 2.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 249, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

20682.5.

(a) A district may construct or complete any building, structure, or improvement with its own forces or by contract without bidding when the cost does not exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000).

(b) All contracts for the construction or completion of any building, structure, or improvement, when the cost exceeds twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000), shall be contracted for and let to the lowest responsible bidder after notice. If two or more bids are the same and the lowest, the district board may accept the one it chooses.

(c) The district shall publish a notice inviting bids for any contract for which
 competitive bidding is required at least one time in a newspaper of general circulation in the district at least 10 days before the time specified for receiving bids. The notice inviting bids shall set a date for opening the bids and distinctly state the work to be done.

(d) If the general manager recommends and the board of directors determines that the publication of advertisements of the notice in trade journals and papers in lieu of publication pursuant to subdivision (c) will increase the number of business enterprises receiving that notice, the board of directors may by resolution declare that those notices shall be published in trade journals and papers at least 10 days prior to the time specified for receiving bids.

(e) If plans and specifications are prepared describing the work, all bidders shall be afforded an opportunity to examine the plans and specifications, and the
 plans and specifications shall be attached to and become part of the contract, if one is awarded.

(f) At its discretion, the board of directors may reject any bids presented and readvertise.

(g) In the case of an emergency, the board of directors may act pursuant to Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 22050).

(h) The board of directors may, subject to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 9550) of Title 3 of Part 6 of Division 4 of the Civil Code, require the posting of those bonds it deems desirable as a condition to the filing of a bid or the letting of a contract.

(i) The district shall keep cost records of the work in the manner provided in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 4000) of Division 5 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(j) As an alternate to the procedures required by this section, a district may rely on the Uniform Public Construction Cost Accounting Act, Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 22000) of Part 3 of Division 2.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 51.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697.)
-------------------------------------------

20683.

All bids for construction work shall be presented under sealed cover and shall be accompanied by one of the following forms of bidder’s security:

(a) Cash.

(b) A cashier’s check made payable to the district.

(c) A certified check made payable to the district.

(d) A bidder’s bond executed by an admitted surety insurer, made payable to the district.

Upon an award to the lowest bidder, the security of an unsuccessful bidder shall be returned in a reasonable period of time, but in no event shall that security be held by the district beyond 60 days from the time the award is made.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 20685.5 by Stats. 2005, Ch. 249, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 43.1. Redevelopment Agencies [20688.1. - 20688.4.]

20688.1.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts awarded by entities as provided in Part 1 (commencing with Section 33000) of Division 24 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 51.5.)
-------------------------------------------

20688.2.

Any work of grading, clearing, demolition, or construction undertaken by the agency shall be done by contract after competitive bids if the cost of that work exceeds the amount specified in Section 20162, as that section presently exists or may be hereafter amended. With respect to work of grading, clearing, demolition, or construction that is not in excess of that amount, the agency may contract the work without competitive bids, and in contracting the work may give priority to the residents of the redevelopment project areas and to persons displaced from
 those areas as a result of redevelopment activities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 552.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

20688.25.

All bids for construction work shall be presented under sealed cover and shall be accompanied by one of the following forms of bidder’s security:

(a) Cash.

(b) A cashier’s check made payable to the local agency.

(c) A certified check made payable to the local agency.

(d) A bidder’s bond executed by an admitted surety insurer, made payable to the agency.

Upon an award to the lowest bidder, the security of an unsuccessful bidder shall be returned in a reasonable period of time, but in no event shall that security be held by the local agency beyond 60 days from the time the award is made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 808, Sec. 45.)
-------------------------------------------

20688.3.

(a) To the greatest extent feasible, opportunities for training and employment arising from any contract for work to be performed in connection with any redevelopment project shall be given to the lower income residents of the project area.

(b) An agency with a resident population of less than 1,000 persons in its territorial jurisdiction, and with a secured assessed valuation of not more than thirty million dollars ($30,000,000) as shown on the 1978–79 assessment roll, may, by contract, obligate lessees and purchasers of real property acquired in a redevelopment
 project and owners of property improved as part of a redevelopment project to give preference to training and employment, in businesses to be conducted on the property, to residents of the project area upon such terms and conditions as may be mutually agreed upon. In the event that there is an agreement between the employer and a labor organization which restricts the employer’s ability to employ project area residents, then such labor organization shall give preference as to entry into the particular labor organization, and with respect to employment in a business on the property, to residents of the project area otherwise qualified.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 51.5.)
-------------------------------------------

20688.4.

An agency shall require each successful bidder to file with it good and sufficient bonds, to be approved by it. The bonds shall be conditioned upon the faithful performance of the contract and upon the payment of all claims for labor and material in connection with the contract. The bonds shall contain the terms and conditions set forth in Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 9550) of Title 3 of Part 6 of Division 4 of the Civil Code and are subject to the provisions of that chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 52.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 44. County Harbor Commissions [20690. - 20696.]

20690.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by county harbor commissions as provided for in Division 7 (commencing with Section 4000) of the Harbors and Navigation Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 256, Sec. 87.)
-------------------------------------------

20693.

The commission may do all the work of improvement, development, or protection under one contract, or it may segregate it into separate parts or divisions, and let contracts for any one or more separate parts or divisions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 256, Sec. 87.)
-------------------------------------------

20694.

Each contract for doing any part of the work shall be let after advertisement for bids by publishing notice for at least 10 days in one or more daily newspapers published in the county. If there is no daily paper published in the county, notice shall be given by three publications in a weekly paper published therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 256, Sec. 87.)
-------------------------------------------

20694.5.

All bids for construction work shall be presented under sealed cover and shall be accompanied by one of the following forms of bidder’s security:

(a) Cash.

(b) A cashier’s check made payable to the commission.

(c) A certified check made payable to the commission.

(d) A bidder’s bond executed by an admitted surety insurer, made payable to the commission.

Upon an award to the lowest bidder, the security of an unsuccessful bidder shall be returned in a reasonable period of time, but in no event shall that security be held by the commission beyond 60 days from the time the award is made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 808, Sec. 46.)
-------------------------------------------

20695.

Each contract shall be let to the lowest responsible bidder, who shall give such security as the commission requires for the full and faithful performance of the contract. The amount and kind of security required shall be stated in the advertisement for bids.

The board may authorize the commission to make contracts without advertising for bids for any part of the work, the cost of which does not exceed five hundred dollars ($500).

The commission may reject any and all bids, and readvertise for bids for doing the whole or any part of the work, or the commission may, with the approval of the board, purchase material, hire or purchase machinery, apparatus or appliances and employ labor and do the work or any part thereof without readvertising for bids.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 256, Sec. 87.)
-------------------------------------------

20696.

All improvement, development or protection of any harbor done under this article shall be of a substantial and permanent character.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 256, Sec. 87.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 45. Harbor Improvement Districts [20710. - 20710.]

20710.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by harbor improvement districts as provided for in Part 2 (commencing with Section 5800) of Division 8 of the Harbors and Navigation Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 256, Sec. 88.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 46. Harbor Districts [20720. - 20724.]

20720.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by harbor districts as provided for in Part 3 (commencing with Section 6000) of Division 8 of the Harbors and Navigation Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 256, Sec. 89.)
-------------------------------------------

20723.

All work authorized to be done under this article, exceeding in cost the sum of five thousand dollars ($5,000) shall be awarded upon competitive bidding, except that work consisting solely of new construction is required to be awarded upon competitive bidding only if it exceeds in cost the sum of ten thousand dollars ($10,000). Notice of the proposed letting of such a contract shall be given by advertisement for a period of two weeks or published pursuant to Section 6066 of the Government Code, in a newspaper of general circulation, published, printed, and circulated, in the district. The board may authorize additional publication in other newspapers of general circulation in the district when it deems that such publication would best serve the public interest. The contract shall be awarded to the lowest responsible bidder.

The board may, without advertising for bids, negotiate with the government of the United States for the purpose of assisting the board in the performance of any of the work authorized by this article, and the board may contribute to the United States all or any portion of the estimated cost of any work authorized by this part which is to be done by or under contract with the United States.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 256, Sec. 89.)
-------------------------------------------

20724.

All bids for construction work shall be presented under sealed cover and shall be accompanied by one of the following forms of bidder’s security:

(a) Cash.

(b) A cashier’s check made payable to the district.

(c) A certified check made payable to the district.

(d) A bidder’s bond executed by an admitted surety insurer, made payable to the district.

Upon an award to the lowest bidder, the security of an unsuccessful bidder shall be returned in a reasonable period of time, but in no event shall that security be held by the district beyond 60 days from the time the award is made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 808, Sec. 47.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 47. Small Craft Harbor Districts [20730. - 20737.]

20730.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by small craft harbor districts as provided for in the Small Craft Harbor District Law pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 7000) of Division 8 of the Harbors and Navigation Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 256, Sec. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

20736.

(a) All construction authorized under this article that exceeds two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) shall be awarded upon competitive bidding. Notice of the proposed letting of such a contract shall be published pursuant to Section 6066 of the Government Code in a newspaper of general circulation in the district or, if there is none, of general circulation in the county, the first publication to be at least two weeks prior to the opening of bids. The notice inviting bids shall set a date for the opening of bids. The contract shall be awarded to the lowest responsible bidder. In its discretion, the board may reject any bids presented and readvertise. If two or more bids are the same and the lowest, the board may accept the one it chooses. If no bids are received, the board may have the work done directly by purchasing the materials and hiring the labor.

(b) If all bids are rejected, the board may adopt a resolution, by four-fifths vote, declaring that the work can be performed more economically by hiring day labor, or that the materials or supplies can be furnished at a lower price in the open market, and may have the work done in the manner stated in the resolution in order to take advantage of this lower cost.

(c) If there is an emergency, the board may, by four-fifths vote adopt a resolution declaring that the public interest and necessity demand the immediate expenditure of public money to safeguard life, health, or property, and expend any sum required in the emergency without submitting the expenditure to the bidding procedure set forth. If notice for bid to let contracts will not be given, the board shall comply with Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 22050).

(d) The board may negotiate with the government of the United States or any department or agency thereof, the state or any department or agency thereof, or any local public agency for the purpose of assisting the district in the performance of any of the work authorized by this article and, without advertising for bids, may cause the district to contribute to the United States, the State of California, or any local public agency all or any portion of the estimated cost of any work authorized by this article which is to be done by or under contract with the United States, the State of California, or any local public agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 643, Sec. 27.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

20737.

All bids for construction work shall be presented under sealed cover and shall be accompanied by one of the following forms of bidder’s security:

(a) Cash.

(b) A cashier’s check made payable to the district.

(c) A certified check made payable to the district.

(d) A bidder’s bond executed by an admitted surety insurer, made payable to the district.

Upon an award to the lowest bidder, the security of an unsuccessful bidder shall be returned in a reasonable period of time, but in no event shall that security be held by the district beyond 60 days from the time the award is made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 808, Sec. 48.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 48. Port Districts [20750. - 20753.]

20750.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by port districts as provided in Part 4 (commencing with Section 6200) of Division 8 of the Harbors and Navigation Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 256, Sec. 91.)
-------------------------------------------

20751.

Contracts for the doing of new construction work, the cost of which exceeds ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or the purchasing of supplies, the cost of which exceeds twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000), or projects involving maintenance of buildings and improvements, the cost of which exceeds ten thousand dollars ($10,000), shall be let by the board upon competitive bidding.

Notice of the proposed letting of contract shall be given by publication pursuant to Section 6061 of the Government Code in the county in which the district is located, at least five days before the time fixed for opening bids. Bidding shall be by sealed proposals filed with the district, upon forms furnished by it, and under such rules and regulations as the board may prescribe. All bids shall be publicly opened and declared under procedures established by the board, and the award of the contract shall be made in open session of the board to the lowest and best responsible bidder.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 56.5.)
-------------------------------------------

20751.1.

In case of an emergency, the board may, by resolution passed by a four-fifths vote of all of its members, declare and determine that public interest and necessity demand the immediate expenditure of public money to safeguard life, health, or property, and thereupon proceed to expend any sum or enter into a contract involving the expenditure of any sum needed in the emergency without observance of the provisions requiring contracts, bids, or notice. If notice for bid to let contracts will not be given, the board shall also comply with Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 22050).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 803, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

20751.2.

Notwithstanding Section 20751, the board of the Ventura Port District may award a contract for the performance of dredging work within the district’s boundaries without competitive bidding, provided that both of the following apply:

(a) The dredging contractor was selected through a federal competitive bidding process for a federal dredging project then underway in the County of Ventura.

(b) The board makes written findings, based on substantial evidence in the record, that the contract awarded pursuant to this section is likely to cost less than a contract awarded pursuant to Section
 20751.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 51, Sec. 1.   (AB 482)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

20752.2.

Notwithstanding Section 20751, all bids for construction work shall be presented under sealed cover and shall be accompanied by one of the following forms of bidder’s security:

(a) Cash.

(b) A cashier’s check made payable to the district.

(c) A certified check made payable to the district.

(d) A bidder’s bond executed by an admitted surety insurer, made payable to the district.

Upon an award to the lowest bidder, the security of an unsuccessful bidder shall be returned in a reasonable period of time, but in no event shall that security be held by the district beyond 60 days from the time the award is made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 808, Sec. 49.)
-------------------------------------------

20753.

The board may delegate to its officers the execution of contracts in which the amount involved is less than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 8, Sec. 4.   Effective February 8, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 49. River Port Districts [20760. - 20764.]

20760.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by river port districts as provided for in Part 6 (commencing with Section 6800) of Division 8 of the Harbors and Navigation Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 256, Sec. 92.)
-------------------------------------------

20761.

Contracts for the doing of new construction work, the cost of which exceeds ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or the purchasing of supplies, the cost of which exceeds twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000), or projects involving maintenance of buildings and improvements, the cost of which exceeds ten thousand dollars ($10,000), shall be let by the board upon competitive bidding.

Notice of the proposed letting of a contract shall be given by publication pursuant to Section 6061 of the Government Code in the county in which the district is located, at least five days before the time fixed for opening bids. Bidding shall be by sealed proposals filed with the district upon forms furnished by it, and under such rules and regulations as the board may prescribe. All bids shall be publicly opened and declared under procedures established by the board, and the award of the contracts shall be made in open session of the board to the lowest and best responsible bidder. The board may reject any and all bids and readvertise in its discretion.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 57.5.)
-------------------------------------------

20761.5.

Notwithstanding Section 20761, all bids for construction work shall be presented under sealed cover and shall be accompanied by one of the following forms of bidder’s security:

(a) Cash.

(b) A cashier’s check made payable to the district.

(c) A certified check made payable to the district.

(d) A bidder’s bond executed by an admitted surety insurer, made payable to the district.

Upon an award to the lowest bidder, the security of an unsuccessful bidder shall be returned in a reasonable period of time, but in no event shall that security be held by the district beyond 60 days from the time the award is made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 808, Sec. 50.)
-------------------------------------------

20762.

In case of an emergency such as a fire, flood, storm, or other disaster, the board may, by resolution passed by the vote of four-fifths of all members, declaring that the public interest and necessity demand the immediate expenditure of district money to safeguard life, health, or property expend such sums as may be necessary in the emergency.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 256, Sec. 92.)
-------------------------------------------

20764.

The board may delegate to its officers the execution of contracts, in which the amount involved is less than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 8, Sec. 6.   Effective February 8, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 50. Sanitation Districts [20780. - 20784.]

20780.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by sanitation districts as provided for in the County Sanitation District Act pursuant to Division 5 (commencing with Section 4700) of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 256, Sec. 93.)
-------------------------------------------

20782.

A district may make and perform any agreement with any public or private corporation of any kind or any person for the joint construction, acquisition, disposition, or operation of any property or works of a kind which might be constructed, acquired, disposed of, or operated by the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 256, Sec. 93.)
-------------------------------------------

20783.

When work is done by the district itself by force account, the amount shall not exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000). When the expenditure required for the work exceeds thirty-five thousand dollars ($35,000), it shall be contracted for and let to the lowest responsible bidder after notice. The notice inviting bids shall set a date for the opening of bids. The first publication or posting of the notice shall be at least 10 days before the date of opening the bids. Notice shall be published at least twice, not less than five days apart, in a newspaper of general circulation, printed and published in the district, or if there is none, it shall be posted in at least three public places in the district that have been designated by the district board as the places for posting this notice. The notice shall distinctly state the work to be done.

In its discretion, the district board may reject any bids presented and readvertise. If two or more bids are the same and the lowest, the district board may accept the one it chooses. If no bids are received, the district board may have the work done without further bid.

If all bids are rejected, the district board, on a resolution adopted by a four-fifths vote, may declare that the work can be performed more economically by day labor, or the materials or supplies furnished at a lower price in the open market and may have the work done in a manner stated in the resolution in order to take advantage of this lower cost.

If there is a present or anticipated great public calamity, including an extraordinary fire, flood, storm, or other disaster the district board may, by resolution adopted by a four-fifths vote declaring that the public interest and necessity demand immediate expenditure of public money to safeguard life, health, or property, expend any sum required in the emergency without submitting the expenditure to bid.

Cost records of the work shall be kept in the manner provided in Sections 4000 to 4007, inclusive, of the Government Code.

This section shall not apply to sewerage maintenance, repair work, or to any uncompleted works under construction by district forces prior to the enactment of this section, and shall not be construed to exempt any work from Part 7 (commencing with Section 1720) of Division 2 of the Labor Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 142, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

20784.

All bids for construction work shall be presented under sealed cover and shall be accompanied by one of the following forms of bidder’s security:

(a) Cash.

(b) A cashier’s check made payable to the district.

(c) A certified check made payable to the district.

(d) A bidder’s bond executed by an admitted surety insurer, made payable to the district.

Upon an award to the lowest bidder, the security of an unsuccessful bidder shall be returned in a reasonable period of time, but in no event shall that security be held by the district beyond 60 days from the time the award is made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 808, Sec. 51.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 51. Sewer Maintenance Districts [20790. - 20793.]

20790.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by sewer maintenance districts as provided for in the Sewer Maintenance District Act pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 4860) of Part 3 of Division 5 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 256, Sec. 94.)
-------------------------------------------

20791.

“Maintenance of sewers” as used in this chapter includes the extension and enlargement of sewers, within a district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 256, Sec. 94.)
-------------------------------------------

20793.
